Vermont, session 2025-2026, H599.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 30 V.S.A. § 8010 is amended to read:
§ 8010. SELF-GENERATION AND NET METERING
* * *
(d) An amendment to a certificate of public good that has been issued
under the rules of this section shall only be needed if the modifications to a net
metering system increase the total capacity of the system to more than 25 kW.
* * *
VT LEG #386208 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.599
2026 Page 2 of 2
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #386208 v.2